Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Repealed.

§ 51-11-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-251; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-3. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-252; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-5. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-253; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 402, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 92; Laws, 2004, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§ 51-11-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-254; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., ch. 19; Laws, 1966, ch. 272, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).]

§ 51-11-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-255; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 93, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000).]

§ 51-11-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-257; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 7; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 51-11-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-258; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1984; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 616, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-259; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 51-11-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-260; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-261; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 11; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 94, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000).]

§ 51-11-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-269; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 51-11-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-270; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved July 18, 1968).]

§ 51-11-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-271; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 51-11-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-272; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved July 18, 1968).]

§ 51-11-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-29. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-273; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved July 18, 1968).]

§ 51-11-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-31. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-256; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 32, eff from and after October 1, 1986.]

§ 51-11-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-33. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-256; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 18, 1968).]

§ 51-11-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-35. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-256; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 33, eff from and after October 1, 1986.]

§ 51-11-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-37. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-256; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 18, 1968).]

§ 51-11-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-39. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-262; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 12, eff from and after December 1, 1988.]

§ 51-11-41.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-41. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-263; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-43. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-264; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 14; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 51-11-45.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-45. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-265; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-47.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-47. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-266; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-49. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-274; Laws, 1968, ch. 264, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved July 18, 1968).]

§ 51-11-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-51. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-267; Laws, 1964, ch. 255, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).]

§ 51-11-52.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-52. [Laws, 1984, ch. 426, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 51-11-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-53. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 577, § 1, eff from and after Apr. 7, 2001.]

§ 51-11-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-55. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-57.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-57. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 577, § 2, eff from and after Apr. 7, 2001.]

§ 51-11-59.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-59. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 577, § 3, eff from and after Apr. 7, 2001.]

§ 51-11-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-61. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-63. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-65.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-65. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-67. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 577, § 4, eff from and after March 6, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).]

§ 51-11-69.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-69. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-71. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-73. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 11; Laws, 2001, ch. 577, § 5, eff from and after Apr. 7, 2001.]

§ 51-11-75.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-75. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-77.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-77. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-79. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-81.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-81. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-83.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-83. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-85.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§51-11-85. [Laws, 1998, ch. 515, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 51-11-87
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§51-11-87. [Laws, 2001, ch. 577, § 6, eff from and after Apr. 7, 2001.]